Utah statutes.
76-8-901.   "Criminal syndicalism" and "sabotage" defined.
For the purpose of this part:
(1)  "Criminal syndicalism" is the doctrine which advocates crime, violence,
force, arson, destruction of property, sabotage, or other unlawful acts or
methods, as a means of accomplishing or effecting industrial or political
ends, or as a means of effecting industrial or political revolution.
(2)  "Sabotage" means the unlawful and intentional damage or injury to, or
destruction of, real or personal property, in any form whatsoever, of any
employer or owner by his employees, or by any employer, or by any person at
the instance of any employer, or at the instance, request, or instigation of
employees, or any other person.
